Nevada, session 83, AB394.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 396 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Board of Regents may require each institution within
the System to, in consultation with the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human
Services, adopt an emergency response plan to address opioid-
related drug overdoses at the institution. Such an emergency
response plan must include, without limitation:
(a) Plans for providing education on opioid-related drug
overdoses;
(b) Measures to respond compassionately to opioid-related
drug overdoses, including, without limitation:
(1) Emphasizing rescue breathing techniques; and
(2) Utilizing naloxone hydrochloride in the lowest dosage
effective to restore breathing;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(c) Procedures for the distribution and administration of
opioid antagonists, including, without limitation, ensuring ease of
access to opioid antagonists; and
(d) Provisions ensuring that a student will not be subject to
disciplinary action by the institution for obtaining an opioid
antagonist.
2. Each institution within the System may tailor the
emergency response plan described in subsection 1 to meet the
needs and capacity of the institution for implementing the plan. In
tailoring an emergency response plan, an institution may
determine:
(a) Whether training related to the plan will be provided in
person or virtually and synchronously or asynchronously;
(b) The locations at the institution where opioid antagonists
will be accessible; and
(c) The manner in which opioid antagonists will be distributed
at the institution.
3. An emergency response plan described in subsection 1 may
not require a person to complete any training in order to obtain or
administer an opioid antagonist.
4. The Board of Regents may adopt a model emergency
response plan that meets the requirements of this section to assist
institutions in developing their emergency response plans
pursuant to subsection 1. The Board of Regents may not require
an institution to utilize the model emergency response plan.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Opioid antagonist” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 453C.040.
(b) “Opioid-related drug overdose” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 453C.050.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)